Hawaii statutes.
[§708-835.8] Theft of beer keg. (1) A
person commits the offense of theft of beer keg if the person commits theft of
a beer keg.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "beer
keg" means a metal container used to hold five gallons or more of liquid
that is stamped, engraved, stenciled, or otherwise marked with the name of a
brewery manufacturer; provided that a deposit beverage container, as defined
under section 342G-101, shall not be considered a beer keg.

(3) Theft of beer keg is a misdemeanor. [L 2008,
c 53, §§1, 6; am L 2009, c 44, §2]

Cross References

Scrap dealer requirements, see chapter 445, pt X.

COMMENTARY ON §708-835.8

Act 53, Session Laws 2008, added this section, establishing
the misdemeanor offense of theft of a beer keg. Metal beer kegs were being
stolen at escalating rates, largely because they can be redeemed for fast cash
at scrap dealerships. House Standing Committee Report Nos. 1113-08 and
1671-08.

Act 44, Session Laws 2009, made permanent the prohibition
against stealing beer kegs and the documentation requirements for scrap metal
dealers. The legislature found that the prohibitions, record-keeping
requirements, and penalties in the current law had proven effective at
deterring the theft of beer kegs and should be made permanent. Senate Standing
Committee Report No. 1240.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next